Hawaii statutes.
§449-7 Investigation and ruling. The
commissioner shall make an investigation into the information furnished by the
applicant and may require the applicant to furnish additional information. If
the commissioner is satisfied, with or without a hearing upon the application,
that the applicant has met all the criteria set forth for approval, the
commissioner shall approve the application. [L 1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS
§449-7; am L 1985, c 269, §50; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 6, §6; am L 1992, c
205, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next